Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201268-1708
Act, how cited.

Sections 68-1708 to 68-1735.04 shall be known
and may be cited as the Welfare Reform Act.

Laws 1994, LB 1224, § 8;

Laws 1995, LB 455, § 8;

Laws 1996, LB 892, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 864, § 11;

Laws 2000, LB 1352, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB507, § 1.